District of Columbia statutes.
31-852

Scope.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit, waive, or abrogate the scope or nature of any statutory or common law privilege, including work product, the attorney-client privilege, or the subsequent remedial measures exclusion.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-293, § 3, 50 DCR 296